Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Article 1. General Provisions
§ 20-4-157.
Duties of support enforcement agency.

A support enforcement agency of this state, upon request, shall provide services to a petitioner in a proceeding under this act.

A support enforcement agency of this state that is providing services to the petitioner shall:

Take all steps necessary to enable an appropriate tribunal of this state, another state or a foreign country to obtain jurisdiction over the respondent;

Request an appropriate tribunal to set a date, time and place for a hearing;

Make a reasonable effort to obtain all relevant information, including information as to income and property of the parties;

Within two (2) days, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays, after receipt of notice in a record from an initiating, responding or registering tribunal, send a copy of the notice to the petitioner;

Within two (2) days, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays, after receipt of communication in a record from the respondent or the respondent’s attorney, send a copy of the communication to the petitioner; and

Notify the petitioner if jurisdiction over the respondent cannot be obtained.

This act does not create or negate a relationship of attorney and client or other fiduciary relationship between a support enforcement agency or the attorney for the agency and the individual being assisted by the agency.

A support enforcement agency of this state that requests registration of a child support order in this state for enforcement or for modification shall make reasonable efforts:

To ensure that the order to be registered is the controlling order; or

If two (2) or more child support orders exist and the identity of the controlling order has not been determined, to ensure that a request for a determination is made in a tribunal having jurisdiction to do so.

A support enforcement agency of this state that requests registration and enforcement of a support order, arrearages or judgment stated in a foreign currency shall convert the amounts stated in the foreign currency into the equivalent amounts in dollars under the applicable official or market exchange rate as publicly reported.

A support enforcement agency of this state shall request a tribunal of this state to issue a child support order and an income withholding order that redirect payment of current support, arrearages and interest if requested to do so by a support enforcement agency of another state pursuant to W.S.

20-4-169

.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; 1998, ch. 97, § 2; 2005, ch. 103, § 2; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted “of this state” and deleted “as appropriate” following “petitioner” in the introductory language in (b); inserted “in a record” in (b)(iv) and (v); and added (d), (e) and (f).

The 2015 amendment,

in (b)(i), inserted “or a foreign country”; substituted “two (2) days” for “five (5) days” and deleted “a written” preceding “notice” in (b)(iv) and (b)(v); and made related and stylistic changes.

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-4-140(a)(xxii).

Construction with Child Support Enforcement Act. —

Duty of state to provide child support services to any individual upon request was not limited by provision of Child Support Enforcement Act, chapter 6 of this title, limiting services to Wyoming residents. Flores v. Flores, 979 P.2d 944,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 20-4-158.
Duty of attorney general.

If the state attorney general determines that the support enforcement agency is neglecting or refusing to provide services to an individual, the attorney general may order the agency to perform its duties under this act or may provide those services directly to the individual.

The attorney general may determine that a foreign country has established a reciprocal arrangement for child support with this state and take appropriate action for notification of the determination.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; 2005, ch. 103, § 2; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added (b), designating the existing provision as (a).

The 2015 amendment,

in (b), deleted “or political subdivision” following “foreign country”.

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-4-140(a)(xxii).

§ 20-4-159.
Private counsel.

An individual may employ private counsel to represent the individual in proceedings authorized by this act.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-4-140(a)(xxii).

§ 20-4-160.
Duties of state information agency.

The department of family services child support enforcement section is the state information agency under this act.

The state information agency shall:

Compile and maintain a current list, including addresses, of the tribunals in this state which have jurisdiction under this act and any support enforcement agencies in this state and transmit a copy to the state information agency of every other state;

Maintain a register of names and addresses of tribunals and support enforcement agencies received from other states;

Forward to the appropriate tribunal in the county in this state in which the obligee who is an individual or the obligor resides, or in which the obligor’s property is believed to be located, all documents concerning a proceeding under this act received from another state or a foreign country; and

Obtain information concerning the location of the obligor and the obligor’s property within this state not exempt from execution, by such means as postal verification and federal or state locator services, examination of telephone directories, requests for the obligor’s address from the obligor’s employer or employers, and examination of governmental records, including, to the extent not prohibited by other law, those relating to real property, vital statistics, law enforcement, taxation, motor vehicles, driver’s licenses and social security.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; 1998, ch. 97, § 2; 2005, ch. 103, § 2; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted “names and addresses of” in (b)(ii); substituted “county” for “place” in (b)(iii); and made a stylistic change.

The 2015 amendment,

in (b)(iii), substituted “another state or a foreign country” for “an initiating tribunal or the state information agency of the initiating state”; in (b)(iv), substituted “from the obligor's employer or employers” for “from employer.”

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-4-140(a)(xxii).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Enforcement of claim for alimony or support, or for attorneys' fees and costs incurred in connection therewith, against exemptions, 52 ALR5th 221.

§ 20-4-161.
Pleadings and accompanying documents.

In a proceeding under this act, a petitioner seeking to establish a support order, to determine parentage of a child or to register and modify a support order of a tribunal of another state or a foreign country shall file a petition. Unless otherwise ordered under W.S.

20-4-162

, the petition or accompanying documents shall provide, so far as known, the name, residential address and social security numbers of the obligor and the obligee or the parent and alleged parent, and the name, sex, residential address, social security number and date of birth of each child for whose benefit support is sought or whose parentage is to be determined. Unless filed at the time of registration, the petition shall be accompanied by a copy of any support order known to have been issued by another tribunal. The petition or accompanying documents may include any other information that may assist in locating or identifying the respondent.

The petition shall specify the relief sought. The petition and accompanying documents shall conform substantially with the requirements imposed by the forms mandated by federal law for use in cases filed by a support enforcement agency.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; 1998, ch. 97, § 2; 2005, ch. 103, § 2; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote (a) to conform with changes proposed by the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws.

The 2015 amendment,

in (a), inserted “of a child,” “a tribunal,” and “or a foreign country” in the first sentence, and made a stylistic change.

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-4-140(a)(xxii).

§ 20-4-162.
Nondisclosure of information in exceptional circumstances.

If a party alleges in an affidavit or a pleading under oath that the health, safety or liberty of a party or child would be jeopardized by disclosure of specific identifying information, that information shall be sealed and may not be disclosed to the other party or the public. After a hearing in which a tribunal takes into consideration the health, safety or liberty of the party or child, the tribunal may order disclosure of information that the tribunal determines to be in the interest of justice.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; 2005, ch. 103, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the first sentence, which formerly read: “Upon a finding, which may be made ex parte, that the health, safety or liberty of a party or child would be unreasonably put at risk by the disclosure of identifying information, or if an existing order so provides, a tribunal shall order that the address of the child or party or other identifying information not be disclosed in a pleading or other document filed in a proceeding under this act”; and added the last sentence.

§ 20-4-163.
Costs and fees.

The petitioner may not be required to pay a filing fee or other costs.

If an obligee prevails, a responding tribunal of this state may assess against an obligor filing fees, reasonable attorney’s fees, other costs and necessary travel and other reasonable expenses incurred by the obligee and the obligee’s witnesses. The tribunal may not assess fees, costs or expenses against the obligee or the support enforcement agency of either the initiating or the responding state or foreign country, except as provided by other law. Attorney’s fees may be taxed as costs, and may be ordered paid directly to the attorney, who may enforce the order in the attorney’s own name. Payment of support owed to the obligee has priority over fees, costs and expenses.

The tribunal shall order the payment of costs and reasonable attorney’s fees if it determines that a hearing was requested primarily for delay. In a proceeding under W.S.

20-4-173

through

20-4-184

,

20-4-193

,

20-4-194

and

20-4-197

, a hearing is presumed to have been requested primarily for delay if a registered support order is confirmed or enforced without change.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; 1998, ch. 97, § 2; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

in (b), inserted “of this state” in the first sentence, and inserted “or a foreign country” in the second sentence; in (c), inserted “20-4-193,

20-4-194

and

20-4-197

”; and made related and stylistic changes.

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

§ 20-4-164.
Limited immunity of petitioner.

Participation by a petitioner in a proceeding under this act before a responding tribunal, whether in person, by private attorney, or through services provided by the support enforcement agency, does not confer personal jurisdiction over the petitioner in another proceeding.

A petitioner is not amenable to service of civil process while physically present in this state to participate in a proceeding under this act.

The immunity granted by this section does not extend to civil litigation based on acts unrelated to a proceeding under this act committed by a party while physically present in this state to participate in the proceeding.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; 1998, ch. 97, § 2; 2005, ch. 103, § 2; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted “under this act” in (a).

The 2015 amendment,

in (c), inserted “physically.”

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-4-140(a)(xxii).

§ 20-4-165.
Nonparentage as defense.

A party whose parentage of a child has been previously determined by or pursuant to law may not plead nonparentage as a defense to a proceeding under this act.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-4-140(a)(xxii).

§ 20-4-166.
Special rules of evidence and procedure.

The physical presence of a nonresident party who is an individual in a tribunal of this state is not required for the establishment, enforcement or modification of a support order or the rendition of a judgment determining parentage of a child.

An affidavit, a document substantially complying with federally mandated forms or a document incorporated by reference in any of them, which would not be excluded under the hearsay rule if given in person, is admissible in evidence if given under penalty of perjury or false swearing by a party or witness residing outside this state.

A copy of the record of child support payments certified as a true copy of the original by the custodian of the record may be forwarded to a responding tribunal. The copy is evidence of facts asserted in it, and is admissible to show whether payments were made.

Copies of bills for testing for parentage of a child, and for prenatal and postnatal health care of the mother and child, furnished to the adverse party at least ten (10) days before trial, are admissible in evidence to prove the amount of the charges billed and that the charges were reasonable, necessary and customary.

Documentary evidence transmitted from outside this state to a tribunal of this state by telephone, telecopier, or other electronic means that do not provide an original record may not be excluded from evidence on an objection based on the means of transmission.

In a proceeding under this act, a tribunal of this state shall permit a party or witness residing outside this state to be deposed or to testify under penalty of perjury or false swearing by telephone, audiovisual means or other electronic means at a designated tribunal or other location. A tribunal of this state shall cooperate with other tribunals in designating an appropriate location for the deposition or testimony.

If a party called to testify at a civil hearing refuses to answer on the ground that the testimony may be self-incriminating, the trier of fact may draw an adverse inference from the refusal.

A privilege against disclosure of communications between spouses does not apply in a proceeding under this act.

The defense of immunity based on the relationship of husband and wife or parent and child does not apply in a proceeding under this act.

A voluntary acknowledgment of paternity, certified as a true copy, is admissible to establish parentage of the child.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; 1998, ch. 97, § 2; 2001, ch. 5, § 1; 2005, ch. 103, § 2; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a) substituted “a nonresident party who is an individual” for “the petitioner” and deleted “responding” preceding “tribunal”; in (b), deleted “A verified petition” at the beginning, and substituted “penalty of perjury or false swearing” for “oath”; substituted “record” for “writing” in (e); added (k); and made stylistic and related changes.

The 2015 amendment,

in (e), inserted “electronic”; in (f), inserted “under penalty of perjury or false swearing” in the first sentence; and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-4-140(a)(xxii).

§ 20-4-167.
Communications between tribunals.

A tribunal of this state may communicate with a tribunal outside this state in a record, or by telephone, electronic mail or other means, to obtain information concerning the laws, the legal effect of a judgment, decree or order of that tribunal, and the status of a proceeding. A tribunal of this state may furnish similar information by similar means to a tribunal outside this state.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; 1998, ch. 97, § 2; 2005, ch. 103, § 2; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted “or foreign country or political subdivision” in three places; substituted “a record” for “writing”; and made a stylistic change.

The 2015 amendment,

deleted “or foreign country or political subdivision” following “state” three times; inserted “electronic mail”; and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

§ 20-4-168.
Assistance with discovery.

A tribunal of this state may:

Request a tribunal outside this state to assist in obtaining discovery; and

Upon request, compel a person over which it has jurisdiction to respond to a discovery order issued by a tribunal outside this state.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; 1998, ch. 97, § 2; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “outside
this state” for “of another state” in (a)(i)
and (a)(ii); and made additional stylistic changes.

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 20-4-169.
Receipt and disbursement of payments.

A support enforcement agency or tribunal of this state shall disburse promptly any amounts received pursuant to a support order, as directed by the order. The agency or tribunal shall furnish to a requesting party or tribunal of another state or foreign country a certified statement by the custodian of the record of the amounts and dates of all payments received.

If neither the obligor, nor the obligee who is an individual, nor the child resides in this state, upon request from the support enforcement agency of this state or another state, a tribunal of this state shall:

Direct that the support payment be made to the support enforcement agency in the state in which the obligee is receiving services; and

Issue and send to the obligor’s employer a conforming income withholding order or an administrative notice of change of payee, reflecting the redirected payments.

The support enforcement agency of this state receiving redirected payments from another state pursuant to a law similar to subsection (b) of this section shall furnish to a requesting party or tribunal of the other state a certified statement by the custodian of the record of the amount and dates of all payments received.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; 1998, ch. 97, § 2; 2005, ch. 103, § 2; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added (b) and (c).

The 2015 amendment,

in the introductory language of (a),
inserted “with personal jurisdiction over the parties”; and substituted “outside this state” for “in another state” in (a)(i) and (a)(ii).

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

§ 20-4-170.
Establishment of support order.

If a support order entitled to recognition under this act has not been issued, a responding tribunal of this state with personal jurisdiction over the parties may issue a support order if:

The individual seeking the order resides outside this state; or

The support enforcement agency seeking the order is located outside this state.

The tribunal may issue a temporary child support order if the tribunal determines that the order is appropriate and the individual ordered to pay is:

A presumed father of the child;

Petitioning to have his paternity adjudicated;

Identified as the father of the child through genetic testing;

An alleged father who has declined to submit to genetic testing;

Shown by clear and convincing evidence to be the father of the child;

An acknowledged father as provided by W.S.

14-2-601

et seq.;

The mother of the child; or

An individual who has been ordered to pay child support in a previous proceeding and the order has not been reversed or vacated.

Upon finding, after notice and opportunity to be heard, that an obligor owes a duty of support, the tribunal shall issue a support order directed to the obligor and may issue other orders pursuant to W.S.

20-4-155

.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; 1998, ch. 97, § 2; 2005, ch. 103, § 2; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote (b) to conform with changes proposed by the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws.

The 2015 amendment,

in (a), added “with personal jurisdiction over the parties” in the introductory language and substituted “outside this” for “in another” in (a)(i) and (a)(ii).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-4-140(a)(xxii).

§ 20-4-171.
Employer's receipt of income withholding order of another state; employer's compliance with income withholding order of another state; compliance with multiple income withholding orders.

An income withholding order issued in another state may be sent by or on behalf of the obligee, or by the support enforcement agency to the person defined as the obligor’s employer under W.S.

20-6-201

through

20-6-222

without first filing a petition or comparable pleading or registering the order with a tribunal of this state.

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 97, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 97, § 3.

Upon receipt of an income withholding order, the obligor’s employer shall immediately provide a copy of the order to the obligor.

The employer shall treat an income withholding order issued in another state which appears regular on its face as if it had been issued by a tribunal of this state.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (f) and (g) of this section, the employer shall withhold and distribute the funds as directed in the withholding order by complying with terms of the order which specify:

The duration and amount of periodic payments of current child support, stated as a sum certain;

The person designated to receive payments and the address to which the payments are to be forwarded;

Medical support, whether in the form of periodic cash payment, stated as a sum certain, or ordering the obligor to provide health insurance coverage for the child under a policy available through the obligor’s employment;

The amount of periodic payments of fees and costs for a support enforcement agency, the issuing tribunal, and the obligee’s attorney, stated as sums certain; and

The amount of periodic payments of arrearages and interest on arrearages, stated as sums certain.

An employer shall comply with the law of the state of the obligor’s principal place of employment for withholding from income with respect to:

The employer’s fee for processing an income withholding order;

The maximum amount permitted to be withheld from the obligor’s income; and

The times within which the employer shall implement the withholding order and forward the child support payment.

If an obligor’s employer receives two (2) or more income withholding orders with respect to the earnings of the same obligor, the employer satisfies the terms of the orders if the employer complies with the law of the state of the obligor’s principal place of employment to establish the priorities for withholding and allocating income withheld for two (2) or more child support obligees.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; 1998, ch. 97, §§ 2, 3; 2005, ch. 103, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted “by or on behalf of the obligee, or by the support enforcement agency” and deleted “or entity” following “person” in (a); deleted “or agency” following “person” in (e)(ii); in (g), substituted “two (2) or more” for “multiple” in two places, and deleted “multiple” following “the terms of the”; and made a stylistic change.

§ 20-4-172.
Administrative enforcement of orders.

A party or support enforcement agency seeking to enforce a support order or an income withholding order, or both, issued in another state or a foreign support order may send the documents required for registering the order to a support enforcement agency of this state.

Upon receipt of the documents, the support enforcement agency, without initially seeking to register the order, shall consider and, if appropriate, use any administrative procedure authorized by the law of this state to enforce a support order or an income withholding order, or both. If the obligor does not contest administrative enforcement, the order need not be registered. If the obligor contests the validity or administrative enforcement of the order, the support enforcement agency shall register the order pursuant to this act.

The department of family services shall adopt rules and regulations consistent with federal requirements to implement this section.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; Laws 1997, ch. 193, § 2; 2005, ch. 103, § 2; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted “or support enforcement agency” in (a).

The 2015 amendment,

in (a),
substituted “issued in another state or a foreign support order” “ for “issued by a tribunal of another state”; and in the last sentence in (b), substituted “this act” for “the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act.”

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

§ 20-4-173.
Registration of order for enforcement.

A support order or income withholding order issued in another state or a foreign support order may be registered in this state for enforcement.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; 2005, ch. 103, § 2; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, made a stylistic change.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “issued in another state or a foreign support order” “issued by a tribunal of another state.”

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

§ 20-4-174.
Procedure to register order for enforcement.

Except as otherwise provided in W.S.

20-4-206

, a support order or an income withholding order of another state or a foreign support order may be registered in this state by sending the following records to the appropriate tribunal in this state:

A letter of transmittal to the tribunal requesting registration and enforcement;

Two (2) copies, including one (1) certified copy, of the order to be registered, including any modification of the order;

A sworn statement by the person requesting registration or a certified statement by the custodian of the records showing the amount of any arrearage;

The name of the obligor and, if known:

The obligor’s address and social security number;

The name and address of the obligor’s employer or other payor and any other source of income of the obligor; and

A description and the location of property of the obligor in this state not exempt from execution.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 97, § 3.

Except as otherwise provided in W.S.

20-4-162

, the name and address of the obligee and, if applicable, the person to whom support payments are to be remitted.

On receipt of a request for registration, the registering tribunal shall cause the order to be filed as an order of a tribunal of another state or a foreign support order, together with one (1) copy of the documents and information, regardless of their form.

A petition or comparable pleading seeking a remedy that shall be affirmatively sought under other law of this state may be filed at the same time as the request for registration, or later. The pleading shall specify the grounds for the remedy sought.

If two (2) or more orders are in effect, the person requesting registration shall:

Furnish to the tribunal a copy of every support order asserted to be in effect in addition to the documents specified in this section;

Specify the order alleged to be the controlling order, if any; and

Specify the amount of consolidated arrearages, if any.

A request for a determination of which is the controlling order may be filed separately or with a request for registration and enforcement or for registration and modification. The person requesting registration shall give notice of the request to each party whose rights may be affected by the determination.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; 1998, ch. 97, §§ 2, 3; 2005, ch. 103, § 2; 2008, ch. 116, § 1; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “records” for “documents” in (a); in (a)(v) added the exception and deleted “agency or” preceding “person”; added (d) and (e) and made stylistic changes.

The 2008 amendment,

made a stylistic change.

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2015 amendment,

in (a), added the exception, inserted “or a foreign support order,” and substituted “records to” for “records and information to”; in (b), substituted “an order of a tribunal of another state or a foreign support order” for “a foreign judgment”; and made related changes.

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

§ 20-4-175.
Effect of registration for enforcement.

A support order or income withholding order issued in another state or a foreign support order is registered when the order is filed in the registering tribunal of this state.

A registered support order issued in another state or a foreign country is enforceable in the same manner and is subject to the same procedures as an order issued by a tribunal of this state.

Except as otherwise provided in this act, a tribunal of this state shall recognize and enforce, but shall not modify, a registered support order if the issuing tribunal had jurisdiction.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; 1998, ch. 97, § 2; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

inserted “support”
in (b) and (c);
in (a), inserted “or a foreign support order”;
in (b),” inserted “or a foreign country”; in
(c), substituted “this act” for “ W.S.

20-4-173

through

20-4-184

”; and made a related change.

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

A foreign order becomes a “registered” order upon filing with a Wyoming district court.

Washington ex rel. Mahoney v. St. John, 964 P.2d 1242,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 1998).

UIFSA consistent with full faith and credit clause. —

Rule of affording full recognition of foreign judgments, in reliance on full faith and credit clause of U.S. Constitution, is consistent with Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, which requires Wyoming district courts to recognize and enforce a registered order if the issuing tribunal had jurisdiction. Washington ex rel. Mahoney v. St. John, 964 P.2d 1242,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 1998).

Enforcement of Washington support order. —

Where father admitted to residing in state of Washington with his wife and child while employed there, and wife and child continued to live in Washington after father deserted marriage and returned to Wyoming, Washington court which issued original child support order had personal jurisdiction over father served in Wyoming pursuant to Washington statute, and Wyoming district court was required to enforce the Washington support order pursuant to Wyoming's interpretation of the full faith and credit clause of the U.S. Constitution. State ex rel. Mahoney v. St. John, 964 P.2d 1242,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 1998).

Am Jur 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, Construction, and Application of Full Faith and Credit for Child Support Orders Act (FFCCSOA), 28 USCS § 1738B - State Cases. 18 A.L.R.6th 97.

§ 20-4-176.
Choice of law.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section, the law of the issuing state or foreign country governs:

The nature, extent, amount and duration of current payments under a registered support order;

The computation and payment of arrearages and accrual of interest on the arrearages under the support order; and

The existence and satisfaction of other obligations under the support order.

In a proceeding for arrearages under a registered support order, the statute of limitation of this state or of the issuing state or foreign country, whichever is longer, applies.

A responding tribunal of this state shall apply the procedures and remedies of this state to enforce current support and collect arrearages and interest due on a support order of another state or foreign country registered in this state.

After a tribunal of this or another state determines which is the controlling order and issues an order consolidating arrearages, if any, a tribunal of this state shall prospectively apply the law of the state or foreign country issuing the controlling order, including its law on interest on arrearages, on current and future support, and on consolidated arrearages.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; 1998, ch. 97, § 2; 2005, ch. 103, § 2; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), added the exception in the introductory language, substituted “under a registered support order” for “and other obligations of support and” in (a)(i), inserted “computation and,” “and accrual of interest on the arrearages,” and “support” in (a)(ii); added (a)(iii); in (b), inserted “under a registered support order” and deleted “under the laws” following “limitation”; added (c) and (d); and made stylistic and related changes.

The 2015 amendment,

inserted
”or foreign country” and “of this section” throughout the section, and made related changes.

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

§ 20-4-177.
Notice of registration of order.

When a support order or income withholding order issued in another state or a foreign support order is registered, the registering tribunal of this state shall notify the nonregistering party. The notice shall be accompanied by a copy of the registered order and the documents and relevant information accompanying the order.

A notice shall inform the nonregistering party:

That a registered order is enforceable as of the date of registration in the same manner as an order issued by a tribunal of this state;

That a hearing to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered order shall be requested within twenty (20) days after notice unless the registered order is under W.S.

20-4-207

;

That failure to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered order in a timely manner will result in confirmation of the order and enforcement of the order and the alleged arrearages and precludes further contest of that order with respect to any matter that could have been asserted; and

Of the amount of any alleged arrearages.

If the registering party asserts that two (2) or more orders are in effect, a notice shall also:

Identify the two (2) or more orders and the order alleged by the registering party to be the controlling order and the consolidated arrearages, if any;

Notify the nonregistering party of the right to a determination of which is the controlling order;

State that the procedures provided in subsection (b) of this section apply to the determination of which is the controlling order; and

State that failure to contest the validity or enforcement of the order alleged to be the controlling order in a timely manner may result in confirmation that the order is the controlling order.

Upon registration of an income withholding order for enforcement, the support enforcement agency or the registering tribunal shall notify the obligor’s employer pursuant to W.S.

20-6-201

through

20-6-222

.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; 1998, ch. 97, § 2; 2005, ch. 103, § 2; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted (c); redesignated former (c) as (d); and made a stylistic change.

The 2015 amendment,

in the first sentence in (a),
inserted
“or a foreign support order”; rewrote (b)(ii); in (d), inserted “support enforcement agency”; and made a stylistic
change.

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.